District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.05a

Production of documentary material.

(a)

A certified copy of any record of the Department of Motor Vehicles shall be deemed authentic without further testimony as evidence in any judicial proceeding or administrative hearing.

(b)

The Director may satisfy a Superior Court subpoena directed to the production of documents by providing a duly authenticated copy of any record or other document in the possession of the Department in the form of a photocopy, computer printout, or reproduction of an electronically digitalized or recorded document or information, irrespective of the existence of a corresponding original document.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 122, ch. 222, § 5a
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279, § 103(a), 54 DCR 903